District of Columbia statutes.
25-331

Quotas — Off-premises retail licenses.

(a)

The number of off-premises retailer’s licenses, class A, shall be no more than 250.

(b)

The number of off-premises retailer’s licenses, class B, shall be no more than 300.

(c)

The quotas set forth in this section shall have a prospective effect.

(d)

The quotas set forth in subsection (b) of this section shall not prohibit the issuance of a license for an off-premises retailer’s license, Class B, for the sale of alcoholic beverages in an establishment if:

(1)

The primary business and purpose is the sale of a full range of fresh, canned, and frozen food items, and the sale of alcoholic beverages is incidental to the primary purpose;

(2)

The sale of alcoholic beverages constitutes no more than 15% of the total volume of gross receipts on an annual basis;

(3)

The establishment is located in a C-1, C-2, C-3, C-4, or C-5 zone or, if located within the Southeast Federal Center, in the SEFC/C-R zone;

(4)

The establishment is a full service grocery store which is newly constructed with a certificate of occupancy issued after January 1, 2000, or is an existing store which has undergone renovations in excess of $500,000 in the calendar year in which an application is made; and

(5)

The opinion of the ANC, if any, has been given great weight.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(k), 51 DCR 6525
Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-23, § 2(d), 58 DCR 6509

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-112 and § 25-332.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-187 rewrote par. (5) of subsec. (d) which had read as follows: “(5) The opinion of the ANC in which the establishment is located has been given great weight as specified in Chapter 4.”
D.C. Law 19-23, in subsec. (d)(3), substituted “or, if located within the Southeast Federal Center, in the SEFC/C-R zone;” for a semicolon.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 2(d) of D.C. Law 18-346, in subsec. (d)(3), substituted “or, if located within the Southeast Federal Center, in the SEFC/C-R zone;” for a semicolon at the end.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-346 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Southeast Federal Center/Yards Non-Discriminatory Grocery Store Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-674, December 28, 2010, 58 DCR 130).